Washington statutes.
RCW 18.420.020

Authority of secretary.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1427-S2.SL) ***

In addition to any other authority, the secretary has the authority to:

(1) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW necessary to implement this chapter;

(2) Establish all certification, examination, and renewal fees for certified peer specialists in accordance with RCW 43.70.110 and 43.70.250;

(3) Establish forms and procedures necessary to administer this chapter;

(4) Issue certificates to applicants who have met the education, training, and examination requirements for obtaining a certificate and to deny a certificate to applicants who do not meet the requirements;

(5) Coordinate with the health care authority to confirm an applicants' successful completion of the certified peer specialist education course offered by the health care authority under RCW 71.24.920 and successful passage of the associated oral examination as proof of eligibility to take a qualifying written examination for applicants for obtaining a certificate;

(6) Establish practice parameters consistent with the definition of the practice of peer support services;

(7) Provide staffing and administrative support to the *advisory committee;

(8) Determine which states have credentialing requirements equivalent to those of this state, and issue certificates to applicants credentialed in those states without examination;

(9) Define and approve any supervised experience requirements for certification;

(10) Assist the *advisory committee with the review of peer counselor apprenticeship program applications in the process of being approved and registered under chapter 49.04 RCW;

(11) Adopt rules implementing a continuing competency program; and

(12) Establish by rule the procedures for an appeal of an examination failure.

[ 2023 c 469 s 3.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: 2023 c 469 s 4, which established the Washington state certified peer specialist advisory committee, was vetoed by the governor.